District of Columbia statutes.
4-1321.06

Exceptions for treatment solely by spiritual means.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, no child who in good faith is under treatment solely by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination by a duly accredited practitioner thereof shall, for that reason alone, be considered to have been neglected within the purview of this subchapter.

History

Nov. 6, 1966, 80 Stat. 1355, Pub. L. 89-775, § 6

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-1356.
1973 Ed., § 2-166.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Prevention of Child Neglect Temporary Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-61, November 20, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 8454).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Prevention of Child Neglect Emergency Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Act 10-100, August 9, 1993, 40 DCR 6141).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Prevention of Child Neglect Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-288, July 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4992).